Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
CHAPTER 6 Damages and Costs Generally

13-6-1.
Purpose of damages.

Damages are given as compensation for the injury sustained as a result of the breach of a contract.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2881; Code 1868, § 2889; Code 1873, § 2940; Code 1882, § 2940; Civil Code 1895, § 3794; Civil Code 1910, § 4390; Code 1933, § 20-1402.

13-6-2.
Measure of damages — Generally.

Damages recoverable for a breach of contract are such as arise naturally and according to the usual course of things from such breach and such as the parties contemplated, when the contract was made, as the probable result of its breach.

History.
Civil Code 1895, § 3799; Civil Code 1910, § 4395; Code 1933, § 20-1407.

13-6-3.
Measure of damages — Breach of bond.

Provisions in bonds stipulating the damages to be paid in the event of breach shall be deemed penalties and shall not be enforceable unless the amount stipulated is reasonably related to the amount of the loss resulting from the breach and the damages resulting from the breach are uncertain in nature or amount or are difficult of ascertainment.

Where provisions in bonds stipulating damages to be paid in the event of breach do not comply with the requirements prescribed in subsection (a) of this Code section, only actual damages shall be recoverable in the event of a breach.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2882; Code 1868, § 2890; Code 1873, § 2941; Code 1882, § 2941; Civil Code 1895, § 3795; Civil Code 1910, § 4391; Code 1933, § 20-1403.

13-6-4.
Determination of damages generally.

The question of damages being one for the jury, a reviewing court should not interfere unless the damages are either so small or so excessive as to justify the inference of gross mistake or undue bias.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2888; Code 1868, § 2896; Code 1873, § 2947; Code 1882, § 2947; Civil Code 1895, § 3803; Civil Code 1910, § 4399; Code 1933, § 20-1411.

13-6-5.
Duty of injured party to lessen damages resulting from breach.

Where by a breach of contract a party is injured, he is bound to lessen the damages as far as is practicable by the use of ordinary care and diligence.

History.
Civil Code 1895, § 3802; Civil Code 1910, § 4398; Code 1933, § 20-1410.

13-6-6.
Damages and expenses recoverable — Nominal damages.

In every case of breach of contract the injured party has a right to damages, but if there has been no actual damage, the injured party may recover nominal damages sufficient to cover the costs of bringing the action.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2887; Code 1868, § 2895; Code 1873, § 2946; Code 1882, § 2946; Civil Code 1895, § 3801; Civil Code 1910, § 4397; Code 1933, § 20-1409.

13-6-7.
Damages and expenses recoverable — Liquidated damages generally.

If the parties agree in their contract what the damages for a breach shall be, they are said to be liquidated and, unless the agreement violates some principle of law, the parties are bound thereby.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2881; Code 1868, § 2889; Code 1873, § 2940; Code 1882, § 2940; Civil Code 1895, § 3794; Civil Code 1910, § 4390; Code 1933, § 20-1402.

13-6-8.
Damages and expenses recoverable — Remote or consequential damages.

Remote or consequential damages are not recoverable unless they can be traced solely to the breach of the contract or unless they are capable of exact computation, such as the profits which are the immediate fruit of the contract, and are independent of any collateral enterprise entered into in contemplation of the contract.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2885; Code 1868, § 2893; Code 1873, § 2944; Code 1882, § 2944; Civil Code 1895, § 3798; Civil Code 1910, § 4394; Code 1933, § 20-1406.

13-6-9.
Damages and expenses recoverable — Expenses necessary for compliance with contract.

Any necessary expense which one of two contracting parties incurs in complying with the contract may be recovered as damages.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2891; Code 1868, § 2899; Code 1873, § 2950; Code 1882, § 2950; Civil Code 1895, § 3806; Civil Code 1910, § 4402; Code 1933, § 20-1414.

13-6-10.
Damages and expenses recoverable — Exemplary damages.

Unless otherwise provided by law, exemplary damages shall never be allowed in cases arising on contracts.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2884; Code 1868, § 2892; Code 1873, § 2943; Code 1882, § 2943; Civil Code 1895, § 3797; Civil Code 1910, § 4393; Code 1933, § 20-1405.

13-6-11.
Recovery of expenses of litigation generally.

The expenses of litigation generally shall not be allowed as a part of the damages; but where the plaintiff has specially pleaded and has made prayer therefor and where the defendant has acted in bad faith, has been stubbornly litigious, or has caused the plaintiff unnecessary trouble and expense, the jury may allow them.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2883; Code 1868, § 2891; Code 1873, § 2942; Code 1882, § 2942; Civil Code 1895, § 3796; Civil Code 1910, § 4392; Code 1933, § 20-1404; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 13.

Section not applicable when penalties in another section are exclusive remedy. —

Trial court erred in denying the insurer’s motion for summary judgment on the insured’s claim for attorney fees under O.C.G.A. §13-6-11 because the penalties contained in O.C.G.A. §33-4-6 were the exclusive remedies for a bad faith claim. Thompson v. Homesite Insurance Company of Ga., 345 Ga. App. 183, 812 S.E.2d 541, 2018 Ga. App. LEXIS 204 (2018), cert. denied, No. S18C1044, 2018 Ga. LEXIS 738 (Ga. Nov. 5, 2018).

Attorney’s fees are not recoverable

against a defendant in a suit based upon a “statutory liability.” First Union Nat'l Bank v. Big John's Auto Sales, Inc., 203 Ga. App. 797, 417 S.E.2d 416, 1992 Ga. App. LEXIS 626 (1992).

Section not limited to “attorney’s fees and costs”. —

O.C.G.A. §13-6-11 does not confine itself to “attorney’s fees and costs,” but instead incorporates the broader term “expenses of litigation.” Salsbury Labs., Inc. v. Merieux Labs., Inc., 735 F. Supp. 1555, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16908 (M.D. Ga.), amended, 735 F. Supp. 1555, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16903 (M.D. Ga. 1989).

Section provides for damages to plaintiffs but not to defendants. —

O.C.G.A. §13-6-11 provides for bad faith damages to plaintiffs for having to resort to litigation, but not to defendants. Vogtle v. Coleman, 259 Ga. 115, 376 S.E.2d 861, 1989 Ga. LEXIS 166 (1989).

Generally, only plaintiffs may recover under O.C.G.A. §13-6-11, and such recovery is available only upon a showing that the defendant’s bad faith conduct forced the plaintiff into prosecuting the suit. Salsbury Labs., Inc. v. Merieux Labs., Inc., 735 F. Supp. 1555, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16908 (M.D. Ga.), amended, 735 F. Supp. 1555, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16903 (M.D. Ga. 1989).

Section is generally restricted to plaintiffs. —

The very purpose of O.C.G.A. §13-6-11 is to prevent the recovery of attorney fees when the recovery would amount to a successful counterclaim against the plaintiff merely for filing suit. Ravenwood Church v. Starbright, Inc., 168 Ga. App. 870, 310 S.E.2d 582, 1983 Ga. App. LEXIS 2944 (1983).

Defendant cannot avail oneself of provisions of this statute.

King v. Pate, 215 Ga. 593, 112 S.E.2d 589, 1960 Ga. LEXIS 275 (1960); Pitman v. Dixie Ornamental Iron Co., 122 Ga. App. 404, 177 S.E.2d 167, 1970 Ga. App. LEXIS 878 (1970); G.E.C. Corp. v. Levy, 126 Ga. App. 604, 191 S.E.2d 461, 1972 Ga. App. LEXIS 1233 (1972); Hickman v. Frazier, 128 Ga. App. 552, 197 S.E.2d 441, 1973 Ga. App. LEXIS 1545 (1973). But see Ballenger Corp. v. Dresco Mechanical Contractors, 156 Ga. App. 425, 274 S.E.2d 786, 1980 Ga. App. LEXIS 3054 (1980) (see O.C.G.A. §13-6-11).

Statute does not apply to defendants.

Watson v. Planters & Citizens Bank, 110 Ga. App. 725, 140 S.E.2d 30, 1964 Ga. App. LEXIS 749 (1964); Metropolitan Tractor, Inc. v. Samples Grading Co., 167 Ga. App. 102, 306 S.E.2d 68, 1983 Ga. App. LEXIS 2409 (1983) (see O.C.G.A. §13-6-11).

Statute is not applicable to defense of an action. McDonald v. Rogers, 229 Ga. 369, 191 S.E.2d 844, 1972 Ga. LEXIS 617 (1972), overruled, Gilman Paper Co. v. James, 235 Ga. 348, 219 S.E.2d 447, 1975 Ga. LEXIS 876 (1975) (see O.C.G.A. §13-6-11).

Statute applies only to plaintiffs when defendant acts in bad faith. A defendant cannot avail oneself of the law’s provisions, including a condemnee in a condemnation proceeding. Taylor v. Georgia Power Co., 137 Ga. App. 44, 222 S.E.2d 869, 1975 Ga. App. LEXIS 1202 (1975) (see O.C.G.A. §13-6-11).

Defendants cannot recover attorney fees against plaintiffs. DuBose v. Box, 246 Ga. 660, 273 S.E.2d 101, 1980 Ga. LEXIS 1245 (1980).

O.C.G.A. §13-6-11 did not permit the recovery of expenses incurred in defending a lawsuit when the buyers in a contract dispute failed to show the absence of a genuine dispute on the issues in the counterclaim, the award of attorney fees to the buyers was improper. Dennis-Smith v. Freeman, 277 Ga. App. 822, 627 S.E.2d 872, 2006 Ga. App. LEXIS 210 (2006).

An award of attorney fees to the purchaser of building supplies in a supplier’s action to recover sums allegedly due for the supplies was in error as the purchaser was the defendant in the case. Cox Interior, Inc. v. Bayland Props., LLC, 293 Ga. App. 612, 667 S.E.2d 452, 2008 Ga. App. LEXIS 1027 (2008).

In a dispute between four registered representatives (RRs) and their former firm after the representatives left the firm and went to a competing firm, the trial court erred in denying the firm’s motion for summary judgment on the RRs’ counterclaims for attorney’s fees under O.C.G.A. §13-6-11 because the counterclaims were compulsory counterclaims arising out of the RRs’ employment for which fees were not permitted. HA&W Capital Partners, LLC v. Bhandari, 346 Ga. App. 598, 816 S.E.2d 804, 2018 Ga. App. LEXIS 426 (2018), overruled in part, SRM Group, Inc. v. Travelers Prop. Cas. Co. of Am., 308 Ga. 404, 841 S.E.2d 729, 2020 Ga. LEXIS 235 (2020).

Underlying policy of this statute

barring defendant from transforming plaintiff’s case into defendant’s damage suit for having been sued in no manner relates to cases wherein defendant has asserted a viable, independent claim against plaintiff. Ballenger Corp. v. Dresco Mechanical Contractors, 156 Ga. App. 425, 274 S.E.2d 786, 1980 Ga. App. LEXIS 3054 (1980) (see O.C.G.A. §13-6-11).

Party entitled only to fees attributable to prevailing claims. —

As awards to a lessor of rent and the costs of maintenance and repair of the premises were reversed on appeal, and attorney fees awarded under O.C.G.A. §13-6-11 had to be apportioned to fees attributable to claims on which the lessor prevailed, the case was remanded for a determination of what, if any, remaining claims would authorize an award of fees to the lessor under §13-6-11. Savannah Yacht Corp. v. Thunderbolt Marine, Inc., 297 Ga. App. 104, 676 S.E.2d 728, 2009 Ga. App. LEXIS 214 (2009).

Party sought to be charged acted in bad faith. —

When a bona fide controversy exists, attorney’s fees may be awarded under O.C.G.A. §13-6-11 only when the party sought to be charged has acted in bad faith in the underlying transaction. Latham v. Faulk, 265 Ga. 107, 454 S.E.2d 136, 1995 Ga. LEXIS 124 (1995).

13-6-12.
Effect of tender or deposit in court before trial upon recovery of costs.

If the defendant in an action for breach of contract, before trial, tenders to the plaintiff or deposits in court as much as or more than he finally recovers, no costs shall be recovered accruing subsequent to the tender or deposit.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2887; Code 1868, § 2895; Code 1873, § 2946; Code 1882, § 2946; Civil Code 1895, § 3801; Civil Code 1910, § 4397; Code 1933, § 20-1409.

13-6-13.
Recovery of interest upon damages.

In all cases where an amount ascertained would be the damages at the time of the breach, it may be increased by the addition of legal interest from that time until the recovery.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2886; Code 1868, § 2894; Code 1873, § 2945; Code 1882, § 2945; Civil Code 1895, § 3800; Civil Code 1910, § 4396; Code 1933, § 20-1408.

13-6-14.
Number of actions for breach of contract.

If a contract is entire, only one action may be maintained for a breach thereof; but, if it is severable or if the breaches occur at successive periods in an entire contract, an action will lie for each breach; but all the breaches occurring up to the commencement of the action must be included therein.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2880; Code 1868, § 2888; Code 1873, § 2939; Code 1882, § 2939; Civil Code 1895, § 3793; Civil Code 1910, § 4389; Code 1933, § 20-1401.

13-6-15.
Damages for writing bad checks.

Notwithstanding any criminal sanctions which may apply, any person who makes, utters, draws, or delivers any check, draft, or order upon any bank, depository, person, firm, or corporation for the payment of money, which drawee refuses to honor the instrument for lack of funds or credit in the account from which to pay the instrument or because the maker has no account with the drawee, and who fails to pay the same amount in cash to the payee named in the instrument within ten days after a written demand therefor, as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, has been delivered to the maker by certified mail, or statutory overnight delivery shall be liable to the payee, in addition to the amount owing upon such check, draft, or order, for damages of double the amount so owing, but in no case more than $500.00, and any court costs incurred by the payee in taking the action. In addition to delivery of notice as provided for herein, notice may be given by first-class mail to the address printed on the check given by the maker at the time of issuance or, in the case of a draft or order, to the last known address. If the question of sufficiency of notice becomes an issue, when notice is by first-class mail, the sender of the purported notice shall give an affidavit, under oath, that notice was made as provided for herein and there shall be a rebuttable presumption that proper notice was given.

The payee may charge the maker of the check, draft, or order a service charge not to exceed $30.00 or 5 percent of the face amount of the instrument, whichever is greater, plus the amount of any fees charged to the holder of the instrument by a bank or financial institution as a result of the instrument not being honored, when making written demand for payment.

Before any recovery under subsection (a) of this Code section may be claimed, a written demand in substantially the form which follows shall be sent by certified mail, statutory overnight delivery, or first-class mail supported by an affidavit of service to the address printed or written on the check given by the maker at the time of issuance of the check or, in the case of a draft or order, to the last known address, the notice to be deemed conclusive ten days following the date the affidavit is executed, to the maker of the instrument at the address shown on the instrument:

For purposes of this Code section, the holder of the dishonored check, draft, or order shall file the action in the county where the defendant resides.

It shall be an affirmative defense, in addition to other defenses, to an action under this Code section if it is found that:

Full satisfaction of the amount of the check or instrument plus the applicable service charge and any fees charged to the holder of the instrument by a bank or financial institution as a result of the instrument not being honored was made prior to the commencement of the action;

The bank or depository erred in dishonoring the check or instrument; or

The acceptor of the check or instrument knew at the time of acceptance that there were insufficient funds on deposit in the bank or depository with which to cause the check or instrument to be honored.

In an action under this Code section, the court or jury may, however, waive all or part of the double damages upon finding that the defendant’s failure to satisfy the dishonored check or instrument was due to the defendant receiving a dishonored check or instrument written to the defendant by another party.

Subsequent to the commencement of the civil action under this Code section, but prior to the hearing, the defendant may tender to the plaintiff as satisfaction of the claim an amount of money equal to the sum of the amount of the dishonored check, service charges on the check, any fees charged to the holder of the instrument by a bank or financial institution as a result of the instrument not being honored, and any court costs incurred by the plaintiff in taking the action.

In an action under this Code section, if the court or jury determines that the failure of the defendant to satisfy the dishonored check was due to economic hardship, the court or jury has the discretion to waive all or part of the double damages. However, if the court or jury waives all or part of the double damages, the court or jury shall render judgment against the defendant in the amount of the dishonored check plus service charges on the check plus any fees charged to the holder of the instrument by a bank or financial institution as a result of the instrument not being honored and any court costs incurred by the plaintiff in taking the action.

“You are hereby notified that a check or instrument numbered_______________ , issued by you on_______________(date), drawn upon_______________(name of bank), and payable to_______________ , has been dishonored. Pursuant to Georgia law, you have ten days from receipt of this notice to tender payment of the full amount of the check or instrument plus a service charge of $30.00 or 5 percent of the face amount of the check or instrument, whichever is greater, plus the amount of any fees charged to the holder of the instrument by a bank or financial institution as a result of the instrument not being honored, the total amount due being $ _______________ . Unless this amount is paid in full within the ten-day period, the holder of the check or instrument may file a civil suit against you for two times the amount of the check or instrument, but in no case more than $500.00, in addition to the payment of the check or instrument plus any court costs incurred by the payee in taking the action.”

History.
Code 1981, §13-6-15, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 817, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1299, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 465, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 552, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 775, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 479, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.